Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.320.030

Gifts, conveyances, etc., for scholarship and student aid purposes, receipt and administration.

The board of directors of any school district may accept, receive and administer for scholarship and student aid purposes such gifts, grants, conveyances, devises and bequests of personal or real property, in trust or otherwise, for the use or benefit of the school district or its students; and sell, lease, rent or exchange and invest or expend the same or the proceeds, rents, profits and income thereof according to the terms and conditions thereof, if any, for the foregoing purposes; and enter into contracts and adopt regulations deemed necessary by the board to provide for the receipt and expenditure of the foregoing.

[ 1974 ex.s. c 8 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.58.030.]